Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNESOTA DIVERSIFIED INDUSTRIES; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $450,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $450,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to Minnesota Diversified Industries to provide inclusive employment opportunities and services for people with disabilities. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin CAREER SKILLS PROGRAMMING; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Minnesota Diversified Industries to assist individuals with disabilities through the unified work model by offering virtual, online, and in-person career skills classes augmented with virtual reality tools. Minnesota Diversified Industries shall submit a report on the number and demographics of individuals served, hours of career skills programming delivered, outreach to employers, and recommendations for future career skills delivery methods to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over labor and workforce development policy and finance by January 15, 2028. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end